New York, session 2025-2026, A281.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1885 to read as follows: 3 § 1885. Ride clean rebate program. 1. For purposes of this section 4 "eligible purchase" shall mean the purchase of a bicycle with electric 5 assist, as defined in section one hundred two-c of the vehicle and traf- 6 fic law, or the purchase of an electric scooter, as defined in section 7 one hundred fourteen-e of the vehicle and traffic law, that: (a) has not 8 been modified from the original manufacturer's specifications; (b) uses 9 a battery that has been certified by an accredited testing laboratory 10 for compliance with a battery standard; and (c) such certification or 11 the logo, wordmark, or name of such accredited testing laboratory shall 12 be displayed on packaging or documentation at the time of sale for the 13 product or directly on the product itself. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00296-01-5 A. 281 2 1 2. The authority shall develop a program, entitled the ride clean 2 rebate program, to encourage the deployment of bicycles with an electric 3 assist and electric scooters. 4 3. The program created pursuant to this section shall include a fifty 5 percent rebate, for eligible purchases, provided that a rebate for an 6 eligible purchase shall not exceed one thousand one hundred dollars 7 ($1,100). 8 4. No later than one year from the effective date of this section, the 9 authority shall implement and administer this section including rules 10 relating to the forms required to claim a rebate, the required documen- 11 tation for establishing eligibility for a rebate, procedures and guide- 12 lines for claiming a rebate, and the collection of economic impact data 13 from applicants and any other requirements the authority deems neces- 14 sary. The authority shall determine and publish on its website on an 15 ongoing basis the amount of available funding for rebates remaining in 16 each fiscal year. 17 5. No later than April first, two thousand twenty-seven and annually 18 thereafter, the authority shall issue a report to the temporary presi- 19 dent of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the chair of the senate 20 committee on energy and telecommunications and the chair of the assembly 21 committee on energy detailing the status of its program to encourage the 22 deployment of bicycles with an electric assist and electric scooters. 23 Such report shall include: 24 a. the amount of funding dedicated by the authority for the program in 25 the preceding year; 26 b. the amount of eligible purchases for which a rebate was awarded; 27 c. the amount and geographic distribution of rebates; and 28 d. any other information the authority deems necessary. 29 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.